Tennessee, session 114, HB0194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
On or before December 31, 2025, the executive director of the Tennessee higher
education commission shall submit to the governor, the chair of the education committee
of the senate, and the chair of the committee of the house of representatives having
jurisdiction over higher education a report that includes an evaluation of the utilization,
state financial support, and student academic outcomes, for required discounts and
waivers of the tuition and fees charged at a public institution of higher education. The
report may be submitted by electronic means.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0194
001514
- 1 -